Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20183-117
Director; investigations; hearings; oaths; certify official acts; subpoenas; compel attendance of witnesses; violation; penalty.

The director, or any officer or employee of the division designated by it, shall have the power to hold investigations, inquiries, and hearings concerning matters covered by the State Aeronautics Act and orders, rules, and regulations of the division and concerning accidents in aeronautics within this state. All hearings so conducted shall be open to the public. The director, and every officer or employee of the division designated by it to hold any inquiry, investigation, or hearing, shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of papers, books, and documents. In case of a failure to comply with any subpoena or order issued under the authority of the act, the division or its authorized representative may invoke the aid of any court of this state of general jurisdiction. The court may thereupon order the witness to comply with the requirements of the subpoena or order or to give evidence touching the matter in question. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(11), p. 85;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 16.